Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.045

Licensure by endorsement.

An applicant holding a valid license and currently engaged in practice in another state may be granted a license without examination required by this chapter, on the payment of any required fees, if the secretary in consultation with the advisory committee determines that the other state's licensing standards are substantively equivalent to the standards in this state: PROVIDED, That the secretary in consultation with the advisory committee may require the applicant to: (1) File with the secretary documentation certifying the applicant is licensed to practice in another state; and (2) provide information as the secretary deems necessary pertaining to the conditions and criteria of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW and to demonstrate to the secretary a knowledge of Washington law pertaining to the practice of dental hygiene.

[ 1991 c 3 s 47; 1989 c 202 s 29.]